Tennessee, session 114, SB1437.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 68 of the Private Acts of 1937, and any other acts amendatory
thereto, is amended by deleting Section 6 and substituting:
That it shall, likewise, be the duty of the School Board on or before the first
Monday in May of each year to prepare and file with the Budget Committee an
itemized statement of budget, as specified in Section 2 of this Act, of the funds
which said Board estimates will be necessary for the maintenance and operation
of the schools and expenses incident thereto for the year commencing the first
day of September following the filing of such statement or budget.
SECTION 2. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of Hardeman County. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by
the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 2.
SB1437
002279
- 1 -